Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.410

Psychosexual evaluation.

In the event a judge orders a parent to undergo a psychosexual evaluation, and pending the outcome of the evaluation, the department, subject to the approval of the court, may reassess visitation duration, supervision, and location, if appropriate. If the assessment indicates the current visitation plan is contrary to the child's health, safety, or welfare, the department, subject to approval by the court, may alter the visitation plan pending the outcome of the investigation.

[ 2013 c 254 s 4.]